Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.173

Funeral and cemetery board—Membership—Appointment—Qualifications—Terms—Vacancies—Officers—Quorum.

(1) A funeral and cemetery board is created. The initial appointments to the board include all members from the existing funeral directors and embalmers board and existing cemetery board with their year of expiration of term remaining the same. Subsequent to the initial appointments the board will consist of seven members to be appointed by the governor in accordance with this section.

(2) Three members of the board must be persons who have had experience in the active administrative management of a cemetery authority or as a member of the board of directors of a cemetery authority for a period of five years preceding appointment. Three members of the board must each be licensed in this state as funeral directors and embalmers and must have been continuously engaged in the practice as funeral directors and embalmers for a period of five years preceding appointment. One member must represent the general public and may not have worked in or received any substantive financial benefit from the funeral or cemetery industry. Board members must be a resident of the state of Washington.

(3) All members of the board shall be appointed to serve for a term of four years, to expire on July 1st of the year of termination of their term, and until their successors have been appointed. In case of a vacancy occurring on the board, the governor shall appoint a qualified member for the remainder of the unexpired term of the vacant office. Any member of the board who fails to properly discharge the duties of a member may be removed by the governor.

(4) The board shall meet once annually to conduct its business and to elect a chair, vice chair, and other officers as the board determines, and at other times when called by the director, the chair, or a majority of the members. A majority of the members of the board shall at all times constitute a quorum. A quorum of the board to consider any charges brought under this chapter must include two of the funeral director and embalmer members of the board. A quorum of the board to consider any charges brought under Title 68 RCW must include two of the members who have had experience in the active administrative management of a cemetery authority. If board members cannot serve due to a conflict of interest, a quorum constituting a majority of the members must preside over the hearing.

(5) Each member of the board must be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and must receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

[ 2009 c 102 s 2; 2005 c 365 s 13; 1977 ex.s. c 93 s 8.]

NOTES:

Funeral directors and embalmers account and cemetery account abolished, moneys transferred to funeral and cemetery account—2009 c 102: See note following RCW 18.39.810.